Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5109.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 6A-11-201, 6A-11-301, 6A-11-302, 6A-11-303, 6A-11-304, 6A-11-
305 and 6A-11-306 of the General Laws in Chapter 6A-11 entitled "Transitional Provisions for
Uniform Commercial Code Amendments (2022)" are hereby amended to read as follows:
6A-11-201. Saving clause.
Except as provided in Part 3 of this chapter, a transaction validly entered into before
January 1, 2024 June 10, 2024 and the rights, duties, and interests flowing from the transaction
remain valid thereafter and may be terminated, completed, consummated, or enforced as required
or permitted by law other than this title or, if applicable, this title, as though the amendatory act of
June 10, 2024 had not taken effect.
6A-11-301. Saving clause.
(a) Pre-effective-date transaction, lien, or interest. Except as provided in this part,
chapter 9 of this title as amended by the amendatory act of June 10, 2024 and chapter 12 of this
title apply to a transaction, lien, or other interest in property, even if the transaction, lien, or interest
was entered into, created, or acquired before January 1, 2024 June 10, 2024.
(b) Continuing validity. Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section and § 6A-11-
302 through § 6A-11-306:
(1) A transaction, lien, or interest in property that was validly entered into, created, or
transferred before January 1, 2024 June 10, 2024 and was not governed by this title, but would be

subject to chapter 9 of this title as amended by the amendatory act of June 10, 2024 or chapter 12
of this title if it had been entered into, created, or transferred on or after January 1, 2024 June 10,
2024, including the rights, duties, and interests flowing from the transaction, lien, or interest,
remains valid on and after January 1, 2024 June 10, 2024; and
(2) The transaction, lien, or interest may be terminated, completed, consummated, and
enforced as required or permitted by the amendatory act of June 10, 2024 or by the law that would
apply if the amendatory act of June 10, 2024 had not taken effect.
(c) Pre-effective-date proceeding. The amendatory act of June 10, 2024 does not affect
an action, case, or proceeding commenced before January 1, 2024 June 10, 2024.
6A-11-302. Security interest perfected before effective date.
(a) Continuing perfection: perfection requirements satisfied. A security interest that is
enforceable and perfected immediately before January 1, 2024 June 10, 2024, is a perfected security
interest under the amendatory act of June 10, 2024 if, on January 1, 2024 June 10, 2024, the
requirements for enforceability and perfection under the amendatory act of June 10, 2024 are
satisfied without further action.
(b) Continuing perfection: enforceability or perfection requirements not satisfied. If
a security interest is enforceable and perfected immediately before January 1, 2024 June 10, 2024,
but the requirements for enforceability or perfection under the amendatory act of June 10, 2024 are
not satisfied on January 1, 2024 June 10, 2024, the security interest:
(1) Is a perfected security interest until the earlier of the time perfection would have ceased
under the law in effect immediately before January 1, 2024 June 10, 2024 or the adjustment date;
(2) Remains enforceable thereafter only if the security interest satisfies the requirements
for enforceability under § 6A-9-203, as amended by the amendatory act of June 10, 2024, before
the adjustment date; and
(3) Remains perfected thereafter only if the requirements for perfection under the
amendatory act of June 10, 2024 are satisfied before the time specified in subsection (b)(1) of this
section.
6A-11-303. Security interest unperfected before effective date.
A security interest that is enforceable immediately before January 1, 2024 June 10, 2024,
but is unperfected at that time:
(1) Remains an enforceable security interest until the adjustment date;
(2) Remains enforceable thereafter if the security interest becomes enforceable under § 6A-
9-203, as amended by the amendatory act, on January 1, 2024 June 10, 2024, or before the
adjustment date; and
LC000514 - Page 2 of 5

(3) Becomes perfected:
(i) Without further action, on January 1, 2024 June 10, 2024, if the requirements for
perfection under the amendatory act of June 10, 2024 are satisfied before or at that time; or
(ii) When the requirements for perfection are satisfied if the requirements are satisfied after
that time.
6A-11-304. Effectiveness of actions taken before effective date.
(a) Pre-effective-date action; attachment and perfection before adjustment date. If
action, other than the filing of a financing statement, is taken before January 1, 2024 June 10, 2024,
and the action would have resulted in perfection of the security interest had the security interest
become enforceable before January 1, 2024 June 10, 2024, the action is effective to perfect a
security interest that attaches under the amendatory act of June 10, 2024 before the adjustment date.
An attached security interest becomes unperfected on the adjustment date unless the security
interest becomes a perfected security interest under the amendatory act of June 10, 2024 before the
adjustment date.
(b) Pre-effective-date filing. The filing of a financing statement before January 1, 2024
June 10, 2024, is effective to perfect a security interest on January 1, 2024 June 10, 2024, to the
extent the filing would satisfy the requirements for perfection under the amendatory act of June 10,
2024.
(c) Pre-effective-date enforceability action. The taking of an action before January 1,
2024 June 10, 2024, is sufficient for the enforceability of a security interest on January 1, 2024
June 10, 2024, if the action would satisfy the requirements for enforceability under the amendatory
act of June 10, 2024.
6A-11-305. Priority.
(a) Determination of priority. Subject to subsections (b) and (c) of this section, the
amendatory act of June 10, 2024 determines the priority of conflicting claims to collateral.
(b) Established priorities. Subject to subsection (c) of this section, if the priorities of
claims to collateral were established before January 1, 2024 June 10, 2024, chapter 9 of this title as
in effect before January 1, 2024 June 10, 2024, determines priority.
(c) Determination of certain priorities on adjustment date. On the adjustment date, to
the extent the priorities determined by chapter 9 of this title as amended by the amendatory act of
June 10, 2024 modify the priorities established before January 1, 2024 June 10, 2024, the priorities
of claims to chapter 12 of this title property and electronic money established before January 1,
2024 June 10, 2024, cease to apply.
6A-11-306. Priority of claims when priority rules of chapter 9 do not apply.
LC000514 - Page 3 of 5

(a) Determination of priority. Subject to subsections (b) and (c) of this section, chapter
12 of this title determines the priority of conflicting claims to chapter 12 of this title property when
the priority rules of chapter 9 of this title as amended by the amendatory act of June 10, 2024 do
not apply.
(b) Established priorities. Subject to subsection (c) of this section, when the priority rules
of chapter 9 of this title as amended by the amendatory act of June 10, 2024 do not apply and the
priorities of claims to chapter 12 of this title property were established before January 1, 2024 June
10, 2024, law other than chapter 12 of this title determines priority.
(c) Determination of certain priorities on adjustment date. When the priority rules of
chapter 9 of this title as amended by the amendatory act of June 10, 2024 do not apply, to the extent
the priorities determined by the amendatory act of June 10, 2024 modify the priorities established
before January 1, 2024 June 10, 2024, the priorities of claims to chapter 12 of this title property
established before January 1, 2024 June 10, 2024, cease to apply on the adjustment date.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000514
========
LC000514 - Page 4 of 5